BizarroBalangao.xfst
I %+ d (->) d %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ I (->) I %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ g (->) g %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ I (->) I %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ h (->) h %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ I (->) I %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ k (->) k %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ I (->) I %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ p (->) p %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ I (->) I %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ q (->) q %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ I (->) I %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ t (->) t %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ I (->) I %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ b (->) b %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ o (->) o %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ d (->) d %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ o (->) o %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ g (->) g %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ o (->) o %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ h (->) h %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ o (->) o %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ k (->) k %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ o (->) o %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ p (->) p %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ o (->) o %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ q (->) q %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ o (->) o %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ t (->) t %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ o (->) o %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ b (->) b %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ u (->) u %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ d (->) d %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ u (->) u %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ g (->) g %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ u (->) u %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ h (->) h %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ u (->) u %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ k (->) k %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ u (->) u %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ p (->) p %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ u (->) u %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ q (->) q %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ u (->) u %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ t (->) t %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ u (->) u %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph
;
# Let's start moving these
define DeletionVowel V (->) %+DelV .o. 
# Need to let through things without %+Delv
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] .o.  
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] .o.  
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] .o.  
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] .o.  
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] .o.  
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] .o.  
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] .o.  
0:%+DelV ?+ %+DelV:0 ?* | [%+DelV]* ~$[%+DelV] 
;

define GenPrimaryStress a (->) %[aPrimaryStress%], e (->) %[ePrimaryStress%], 
    i (->)  %[iPrimaryStress%], I (->) %[IPrimaryStress%],
    o (->) %[oPrimaryStress%], u (->) %[uPrimaryStress%] ;

define GenSecondaryStress a (->) %[aSecondaryStress%], 
    e (->) %[eSecondaryStress%], i (->)  %[iSecondaryStress%], 
    I (->) %[ISecondaryStress%], o (->) %[oSecondaryStress%], 
    u (->) %[uSecondaryStress%] ;

define GenStress GenPrimaryStress .o. GenSecondaryStress ;

define Gen [ DeletionVowel .o. GenStress .o. Shuffle .o. Syllabify ] ;

######################### OT CONSTRAINTS #############################

# The Viol family of constraints, and the accompanying comments in 
# this secton, are from Karttunen (2004).  His Finnish prosody
# script may be found at http://www.stanford.edu/~laurik/fsmbook .
#
# We use asterisks to mark constraint violations. Ordinary constraints
# such as Lapse assign single asterisks as the violation marks and the
# candidate with the fewest number is selected. Gradient constraints
# such as AllFeetFirst mark violations with sequences of asterisks.
# The number increases with distance from the word edge.

# Every instance of * in an output candidate is a violation.

define Viol ${*};

# We prune candidates with "lenient composition" that eliminates
# candidates that violate the constraint provided that at least
# one output candidate survives.

define Viol0 ~Viol;        # No violations
define Viol1 ~[Viol^2];    # At most one violation
define Viol2 ~[Viol^3];    # At most two violations
define Viol3 ~[Viol^4];    # etc.
define Viol4 ~[Viol^5];
define Viol5 ~[Viol^6];
define Viol6 ~[Viol^7];
define Viol7 ~[Viol^8];
define Viol8 ~[Viol^9];
define Viol9 ~[Viol^10];
define Viol10 ~[Viol^11];
define Viol11 ~[Viol^12];
define Viol12 ~[Viol^13];
define Viol13 ~[Viol^14];
define Viol14 ~[Viol^15];
define Viol15 ~[Viol^16];

# This eliminates the violation marks after the candidate set has
# been pruned by a constraint.

define Pardon {*} -> 0;

# End of Karttunen's code

########################## CONSTRAINTS ##############################

# Faithfulness constraints

define LinearityBetweenMorphemes [ %+MetBetweenMorph -> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityWithinMorpheme [ %+MetWithinMorph -> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityVV [ %+MetVV -> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityCC [ %+MetCC-> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityCV [ %+MetCV-> ... {*}] ;

define IdentVoice [ %+DeltaVoice -> ... {*}] ;

define IdentNasal [ %+DeltaNasal -> ... {*}] ;

define MaxV [ %+DelV -> ... {*}] ;

# Markedness constraints

define NoGlottObs [ [ GLOTTAL OBSTRUENT ]/[GENTAGS | %+ | "."]-> ... {*}] ;

define NoComplexOnset [C C]/[GENTAGS | %+] -> ... {*} || EDGE _ ;

define NoComplexCoda [C C]/[GENTAGS | %+ ] -> ... {*} || _ EDGE ;

define SonorantNucleus ~$V -> ... {*} || EDGE _ EDGE ;

define HasOnset V -> ... {*} || EDGE/[GENTAGS | %+ ] _ ;

define HasPrimaryStress ~$PRIMARYSTRESS -> ... {*} || .#. _ .#. ;

define OnlyOnePrimaryStress $[PRIMARYSTRESS ?* PRIMARYSTRESS] -> ... {*} || .#. _ .#. ;

define NoStressClash SS/[GENTAGS | %+] "." SS/[GENTAGS | %+ ] -> ... {*} ;

# I might prefer to do this as binary feet
define NoDoubledUnstressed USS/[GENTAGS | %+] "." USS/[GENTAGS | %+ ] -> ... {*} ;

define SSP $[ V+ C+ V+ ]/[GENTAGS | %+] -> ... {*} || EDGE _ EDGE;

define InitialStress ~$PRIMARYSTRESS -> ... {*} || .#. _ EDGE/[GENTAGS | %+] ;

# No unstressed high vowels between two stressed syllables
define NoUnstressedHighVowels C*/[GENTAGS | %+] [ u | i | I ] C*/[GENTAGS | %+] 
    -> ... {*} || SS/[GENTAGS | %+] "." _ "." SS/[GENTAGS | %+ ];

########################## READABILITY ##############################

# Remove tags, turn placeholders to IPA
# ' is currently glottal stop
define Pretty [ GENTAGS | %+ ] -> 0 .o.
I -> ɨ;

define Readable [GENTAGS | %+ ] -> 0 ;

read regex Morphology .o. Gen 
.o. LinearityVV .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityCV .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. SonorantNucleus .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. HasOnset .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. SSP .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoComplexOnset .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoComplexCoda .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. HasPrimaryStress .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. OnlyOnePrimaryStress .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoStressClash .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoDoubledUnstressed .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. InitialStress .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoUnstressedHighVowels .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. MaxV .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityBetweenMorphemes .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. NoGlottObs .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityCC .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
.o. LinearityWithinMorpheme .O. Viol5 .O. Viol4 .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
#.o. Pretty
.o. Readable
;

echo ** hIgIp
down hIgIp;
echo ** hIgIpIn
down hIgIp+In;
echo ** Should metathesize - expect pughip
echo ** puhIgIp
down pu+hIgIp;

echo ** hIdIm
down hIdIm;
echo ** hIdIm+In
down hIdIm+In;
echo ** Shouldn't metathesize
echo ** pu+hIdIm
down pu+hIdIm;

echo ** hIdIn
down hIdIn;
echo ** hIdIn+In
down hIdIn+In;
echo ** Shouldn't metathesize
echo ** pu+hIdIn
down pu+hIdIn;

echo ** gihib
down gihib;
echo ** Shouldn't metathesize
echo ** gihib+In
down gihib+In;
echo ** pu+gihib
down pu+gihib;

echo ** ledeh
down ledeh;
echo ** ledeh+In
down ledeh+In;
echo ** pu+ledeh
down pu+ledeh;
echo ** Should metathesize - expect ledet+ho
echo ** ledeh+to
down ledeh+to;
